Idaho, session 2026, H0532.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 49-401B, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-401B. APPLICATION FOR REGISTRATION -- RECEIPT FOR FEE -- RECORD OF
APPLICANTS. (1) Application for the registration of a vehicle required to
be registered under the provisions of section 49-401A, Idaho Code, shall
be made to the assessor or the department, as specified in that section, by
the owner upon on the appropriate form. Every application shall contain the
owner's Idaho driver's license number, Idaho identification card number,
social security number or individual taxpayer identification number. In the
case of a business, the employer tax identification number is required. Ev-
ery application shall also contain the owner's true and full legal name, and
every applicant must submit proof of identity pursuant to section 49-306,
Idaho Code, if he has not already done so. In the event that the owner does
not possess a social security number, individual taxpayer identification
number, Idaho driver's license number, or Idaho identification card number,
the owner shall present written documentation sufficient to the department
to determine that no social security number has been issued. In the event
that a business, trust or other statutorily created entity is not required
to have and does not possess an employer tax identification number, the ap-
plicant shall provide a written statement certifying that the entity does
not possess an employer tax identification number. Such application must be
signed by the owner and contain his residence address and mailing address,
if different, and a brief description of the vehicle to be registered, in-
cluding the name of the maker, the type of fuel used, and the identification
number. If an applicant has submitted an application pursuant to the provi-
sions of chapter 58, title 19, Idaho Code, then the applicant may state in the
application required pursuant to this section the applicant's alternative
Idaho mailing address in place of his or her residence address. Upon regis-
tration of a new vehicle, the application shall also show the date of sale by
the manufacturer or dealer to the person first operating such vehicle. The
application shall contain any other information as may be required by the
department and shall contain a provision that allows an owner to choose to
participate in the Idaho state parks passport program. The assessor shall
issue to the applicant a receipt for any fee paid. Social security numbers
collected shall not appear on certificates of registration, and all applica-


tions on file shall be exempt from disclosure, except as provided in sections
49-202, 49-203 and 49-203A, Idaho Code.
(2) The assessor shall record on a form prescribed and furnished by the
department, the names of all owners of vehicles residing in the county who
make application for registration, together with the amounts of the fees
paid by such owners.
(3) When application for registration is made by any motor carrier, the
assessor or the department shall require each such applicant to execute a
certification of safety compliance.
(4) Vehicles registered under the proportional registration provi-
sions of section 49-435, Idaho Code, shall be registered by the department.
(5) Every owner of a vehicle registered by a county assessor shall give
his physical domicile residence address or the business physical principal
address to the assessor so that the proper county can be entered upon the reg-
istration. Failure to do so shall be unlawful. The department shall then
attribute the registration, and all fees to be apportioned to the highway
distribution account, to the county of residence regardless of the county in
which the registration occurred. Fees imposed under the provisions of sec-
tions 40-827 and 40-1416, Idaho Code, shall be separately identified and ac-
counted for, and paid to the highway district for which collected. Fees col-
lected in addition to vehicle registration fees for the Idaho state parks
passport program, as provided in section 49-402(11), Idaho Code, shall be
separately identified and accounted for and paid to the state treasurer on a
monthly basis to be deposited in the park and recreation fund as specified in
section 49-402(11), Idaho Code. For the purposes of vehicle registration, a
person is an actual and permanent resident of the county in which he has his
principal residence or domicile. A principal residence or domicile shall
not be a person's workplace, vacation, or part-time residence.
(6) A violation of the provisions of this section shall be an infrac-
tion.
SECTION 2. That Section 49-504, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-504. APPLICATIONS TO DEPARTMENT FOR CERTIFICATES -- PROCEDURE --
IDENTIFICATION NUMBERS. (1) Application for a certificate of title shall be
made upon on a form furnished by the department and shall contain the owner's
Idaho driver's license number, Idaho identification card number or social
security number or individual taxpayer identification number. In the case
of a business, the employer tax identification number is required. Every
application shall also contain the owner's true and full legal name, and
every applicant must submit proof of identity pursuant to section 49-306,
Idaho Code, if he has not already done so. In the event that the owner does
not possess a social security number, Idaho driver's license number, Idaho
identification card number or individual taxpayer identification number,
the owner shall present written documentation sufficient to the department
to determine that no social security number has been issued. In the event
that a business, trust, or other statutorily created entity is not required
to have and does not possess an employer tax identification number, the ap-
plicant shall provide a written statement certifying that the entity does
not possess an employer tax identification number. The form must contain


the owner's physical domicile address or, in the case of a business, trust
or other statutorily created entity, such entity's physical address and any
mailing address if different from the physical address. If the owner has
submitted an application pursuant to the provisions of chapter 58, title 19,
Idaho Code, then the owner may state, in the application required pursuant
to this section, the applicant's alternative Idaho mailing address in place
of his or her physical domicile address. Such application must be signed
by the owner and contain a full description of the vehicle, including the
make, identification numbers, and the odometer reading at the time of sale
or transfer, and whether the vehicle is new or used, together with a state-
ment of the applicant's title and of any liens or encumbrances upon on the
vehicle, and the name and address of the person to whom the certificate of
title shall be delivered, and any other information as the department may
require. The application shall be filed with the department and, if a cer-
tificate of title has previously been issued for that vehicle in this state,
shall be accompanied by the certificate of title duly assigned, unless oth-
erwise provided for in this chapter. The department may promulgate rules to
provide for exceptions to the odometer requirement. Social security numbers
collected shall not appear on certificates of title, and all applications on
file shall be exempt from disclosure, except as provided in sections 49-202,
49-203 and 49-203A, Idaho Code.
(2) If the current certificate of title was not issued for the vehicle
in this state, the application, unless otherwise provided for in this chap-
ter, shall be accompanied by a certificate of title, bill of sale or other ev-
idence of ownership required by the law of any other jurisdiction from which
the vehicle was brought into this state and a vehicle identification number
inspection completed by any city, county or state peace officer or other spe-
cial agent authorized by the department.
(3) In the case of a new vehicle being titled for the first time, no cer-
tificate of title or registration shall be issued unless the application is
endorsed by a franchised new vehicle dealer licensed to sell a new vehicle.
Each application shall be accompanied by a statement completed by the fran-
chised new car dealer that it is authorized to transfer the vehicle to the
purchaser. The dealer shall retain in its records a manufacturer's certifi-
cate of origin or manufacturer's statement of origin executed by the manu-
facturer and delivered to his agent or his franchised vehicle dealer. The
certificate or statement of origin shall be in a form prescribed by the board
and shall contain the year of manufacture or the model year of the vehicle,
the manufacturer's vehicle identification number, the name of the manufac-
turer, the number of cylinders, a general description of the body, if any,
and the type or model. Upon sale of a new vehicle, the manufacturer or his
agent or franchised dealer shall execute and deliver to the purchaser an as-
signment of the certificate or statement, together with any lien or encum-
brance to which the vehicle is subject. The certificate or statement will be
retained by the dealer for five (5) years so that it is available for inspec-
tion by the department.
(4) The department shall retain the evidence of title presented by
the applicant and on which the certificate of title is issued. The depart-
ment shall maintain an identification numbers index of registered vehicles
except that, but said index is not required to include operators who have


been issued a certificate of number or nonresident user certificate pursuant
to sections 67-7122 and 67-7124, Idaho Code, and, upon receiving an applica-
tion for a certificate of title shall first check the identification number
shown in the application against the index. The department, when satisfied
that the applicant is the owner of the vehicle and that the application is in
proper form, shall issue in the name of the owner of the vehicle a certifi-
cate of title bearing a title number, the date issued and a description of
the vehicle as determined by the department, together with a statement of
the owner's title and of all liens or encumbrances upon on the vehicle, and
whether possession is held by the owner under a lease, contract or condi-
tional sale, or other like agreement.
(5) In all cases of transfer of vehicles, the application for certifi-
cates of title shall be filed within thirty (30) calendar days after the de-
livery of the vehicles. Licensed dealers need not apply for certificate of
title for vehicles in stock or when they are acquired for stock purposes.
(6) In the case of the sale of a vehicle by a dealer to a general pur-
chaser or user, the certificate of title shall be obtained in the name of the
purchaser by the dealer upon application signed by the purchaser. If a lien
is to be recorded, the title documentation as required in this section shall
be submitted to the department by the dealer or the lienholder upon appli-
cation signed by the purchaser. A copy of this application shall be given
to the purchaser to be used as a seventy-two (72) hour temporary permit,
unless the application is submitted by an electronic means approved by the
department, in which case a forty-five (45) calendar day temporary permit
may be issued. In all other cases, the certificates shall be obtained by the
purchaser and the certificate of title properly assigned and dated by the
seller, or the seller's bill of sale shall serve as a seventy-two (72) hour
permit. The seventy-two (72) hour time period for temporary permits shall
be calculated excluding weekend days and legal holidays observed by the
state of Idaho. These temporary permits allow operation of any noncommer-
cial vehicle or unladened commercial vehicle or vehicle combination without
license plates for the period of time specified in the permit. A ladened
commercial vehicle or vehicle combination may also operate without license
plates for the period of time specified in the temporary permit, provided
that the owner or operator has also obtained a permit issued under the provi-
sions of section 49-432, Idaho Code.
(7) If the vehicle has no identification number, then the department
shall designate an identification number for that vehicle at the time of is-
suance of the certificate of title. The identification number shall be per-
manently affixed to or indented upon on the frame of the vehicle and legibly
maintained by the owner at all times while a certificate of title to the vehi-
cle shall be is issued and outstanding.
(8) An EVC provider authorized pursuant to section 49-401C, Idaho Code,
may act on behalf of the department in receiving, processing, and transmit-
ting applications for title and any related fees to the department. The se-
curity, oversight, and processing requirements in chapter 4, title 49, Idaho
Code, shall also apply to titling transactions conducted by an EVC provider.
(9) The department may allow a person to submit a required document by
using electronic media deemed feasible by the department instead of requir-
ing an original document. If a signature on a document is required by law and


the document is submitted electronically, the signature requirement will
be satisfied by an authenticated electronically submitted signature. An
electronically submitted document, once accepted by the department, shall
be deemed the same as an original document and shall be admissible in all
administrative, quasi-judicial, and judicial proceedings.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.